Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 2 Georgia Crime Information Center
35-3-34.1.
Circumstances when exonerated first offender’s criminal record may be disclosed.

When a defendant has been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42, the center is authorized to provide the first offender’s record of arrests, charges, or sentences to the employers and entities and under the conditions set forth in Code Section 42-8-63.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-34.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 35/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 164, § 1/HB 1335; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-10/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 23/SB 178; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-6/HB 78; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-4/SB 367.

Cross references.

Discharges disqualifying individuals from employment, §

42-8-63.1

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

35-3-34.2.
Exchange of national criminal history background checks on providers of care to children, the elderly, and persons with disabilities.

It is the purpose of this Code section to authorize and facilitate, but not require, the exchange of national criminal history background checks with authorized agencies on behalf of qualified entities as authorized under federal law.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Authorized agency” means any local government agency designated to report, receive, or disseminate information under the NCPA and the VCA.

“Care” means the provision of care, treatment, education, training, instruction, supervision, or recreation to children, the elderly, or individuals with disabilities.

“FBI” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

“National criminal history background check” means a fingerprint based check of state and national criminal history files based on submission of a set of classifiable fingerprints and records fee.

“NCPA” means the National Child Protection Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. Sections 3759, 5101 note, 5119, and 5119a through 5119c.

“ORI” means an originating agency identifier.

“Provider” means:

A person who:

Is employed by or volunteers with a qualified entity;

Owns or operates a qualified entity; or

Has or may have unsupervised access to a person to whom the qualified entity provides care; and

A person who:

Seeks to be employed by or volunteer with a qualified entity;

Seeks to own or operate a qualified entity; or

Seeks to have or may have unsupervised access to a person to whom the qualified entity provides care.

“Qualified entity” means a business or organization, whether public, private, for profit, not for profit, or voluntary, that provides care or care placement services, including a business or organization that licenses or certifies others to provide care or care placement services.

“VCA” means the Volunteers for Children Act, 42 U.S.C. Sections 5101 note, 5119a, and 5119b.

An authorized agency is responsible for the designation of qualified entities within its local jurisdiction and for the submission of national criminal history background checks as authorized under the NCPA and the VCA.

An authorized agency, other than a criminal justice agency as defined in Code Section 35-3-30, must request an ORI from the FBI for the express purpose of submitting national criminal history background checks under this Code section. Requests shall be made in writing to the FBI through the center.

National criminal history background checks shall be submitted directly to the center for a state records check; fingerprint cards shall then be forwarded to the FBI for a national check. The responses from both the state and national criminal history background checks shall be returned to the authorized agency.

The authorized agency may provide directly to the qualified entity the state criminal history record provided as part of the national criminal history background check.

An authorized agency shall be responsible for review of the national criminal history record provided as part of the national criminal history background check to determine whether the provider has been convicted of or is under indictment for a crime that bears upon the provider’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children, the elderly, or individuals with disabilities and to convey that determination to the qualified entity.

The qualified entity must obtain the fingerprints of the provider, communicate the fitness determination of the authorized agency to the provider, and notify the provider of his or her right to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any information contained in the national criminal history background check.

Fees charged for a national criminal history background check shall be determined based on reasonable costs as allowed under federal law.

The provisions of this Code section shall be supplementary to and not in place of any other law of this state which authorizes or requires background checks.

Any person, authorized agency, or qualified entity, or any person who is an employee of an authorized agency or qualified entity, shall not disseminate any criminal history or any information concerning any criminal history except the determination of fitness which such person obtains pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-34.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1196, § 1/SB 6.

Code Commission notes.

The enactment of Code Section

35-3-35.1

by Ga. L. 2005, p. 980, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by the enactment of Code Section

35-3-34.2

by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1196, § 1.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, in paragraph (b)(5), the quotation marks were deleted from “National Child Protection Act of 1993,” and “5119, and 5119a through 5119c” was substituted for “5119, 5119(a) to 5119(c)”; and, in paragraph (b)(9), the quotation marks were deleted from “Volunteers for Children Act,” and “5119a, and 5119b” was substituted for “5119(a) and 5119(b)”.

35-3-35.
Disclosure and dissemination of records to public agencies and political subdivisions; responsibility and liability of issuing center.

The center shall be authorized to:

Make criminal history records maintained by the center available to public agencies, political subdivisions, authorities, and instrumentalities, including state or federal licensing and regulatory agencies or their designated representatives, under the following conditions:

Public agencies or political subdivisions shall, at the time of the request, provide the fingerprints of the person whose records are requested in such manner prescribed by the center, which may include the electronic imaging of a person’s fingerprints, or provide a signed consent of the person whose records are requested on a form prescribed by the center which shall include such person’s full name, address, social security number, and date of birth; provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph shall supersede any other provision relating to the submission of fingerprints to the center;

The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 and has been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, including records relating to such defendant’s bench warrants, failure to appear, and probation for such offense, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1. The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced as provided in Code Section 15-1-20, including records relating to such defendant’s bench warrants, failure to appear, and probation for such offense, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1.

During the period of time after a defendant, who has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 but has not been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, has completed active probation supervision through the remainder of such sentence, the center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1.

The center may provide records of arrests, charges, or sentences when an individual has been sentenced pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 but has not been exonerated and discharged without court adjudication of guilt as a matter of law or pursuant to a court order, as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1, while a defendant is under active probation supervision for such offense, or as provided in a court order;

When the identifying information provided is sufficient to identify persons whose records are requested electronically, the center may disseminate electronically criminal history records of in-state felony convictions, pleas, and sentences without:

Fingerprint comparison; or

Consent of the person whose records are requested; and

The center shall not provide records of arrests, charges, or dispositions when access has been restricted pursuant to Code Section 3-3-23.1, 15-1-20, 16-13-2, 35-3-37, or 42-8-62.1;

(1.1)

Make criminal history records maintained by the center available to any county board of registrars or county board of registration and election. The making of an application for voter registration shall be deemed to be consent of the person making the application to release such records to the county board of registrars or county board of registration and election.
Such records shall be requested for the sole purpose of verification of information provided on voter registration cards by registration applicants;

(1.2)

Make criminal history records maintained by the center and national criminal history records maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, obtained by the center, available to the governing authority of any county or municipality, for any applicant or licensee in a specified occupation for which such local governing authority has adopted an ordinance or resolution requiring such applicants or licensees in a particular occupation or profession regulated by the governing authority to be fingerprinted as a condition of submitting an application or obtaining or renewing a license. The center shall establish a uniform method of obtaining criminal history records required under this paragraph. Such uniform method shall require the submission to the center of two complete sets of fingerprints and the records search fee. Upon receipt thereof, the center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. After receiving the fingerprints and fee, the center shall notify the requesting local government authority in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any criminal record data regarding the fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the local governing authority from obtaining national criminal history records directly from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, if an ordinance or resolution requiring the fingerprints of an applicant or licensee of a particular occupation or profession regulated by the local governing authority has been adopted by such governing authority of the county or municipality; and

Charge fees for disseminating records pursuant to this Code section which will raise an amount of revenue which approximates, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state for providing such disseminations.

In the event an employment or licensing decision is made adverse to a person whose record was obtained pursuant to this Code section, the person will be informed by the public agency, political subdivision, authority or instrumentality, or licensing or regulatory agency making the adverse employment decision of all information pertinent to that decision. This disclosure shall include information that a record was obtained from the center, the specific contents of the record, and the effect the record had upon the decision. Failure to provide all such information to the person subject to the adverse decision shall be a misdemeanor.

Neither the center, its employees, nor any agency or employee of the state shall be responsible for the accuracy of information disseminated nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, nor any other claim in connection with any dissemination pursuant to this Code section and shall be immune from suit based upon such claims.

Local criminal justice agencies may disseminate criminal history records to public agencies, political subdivisions, authorities, and instrumentalities, including state or federal licensing and regulatory agencies under the same conditions as set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and may charge fees as necessary to reimburse such agencies for their direct and indirect costs associated with providing such disseminations.

(d.1)

When identifying information provided is sufficient to identify persons whose records are requested, local criminal justice agencies may disseminate criminal history records of in-state felony convictions, pleas, and sentences unless such records are restricted pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1, without:

(d.2)

No fee charged pursuant to this Code section may exceed $20.00 per person whose criminal history record is requested or be charged to any person or entity authorized prior to January 1, 1995, to obtain information pursuant to this Code section without payment of such fee.

Fingerprint comparison;

Prior contact with the center; or

Consent of the person whose records are requested.

Such information may be disseminated to entities to which such records may be made available under subsection (d) of this Code section under the conditions specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this Code section upon payment of the fee for the request and when the request is made upon a form prescribed by the center. Such agencies may charge and retain fees as needed to reimburse such agencies for the direct and indirect costs of providing such information and shall have the same immunity therefor as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The council is empowered to adopt rules, regulations, and forms necessary to implement this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1981, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 203, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1831, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1009, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 633, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1206, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 43, §§ 2, 3/SB 62; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-5/SB 367; Ga. L. 2020, p. 753, § 2-5/SB 288.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subparagraph (a)(1)(D), inserted “3-3-23.1,” and “16-13-2,”; and added “unless such records are restricted pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37, except as specifically authorized by Code Section 42-8-63.1,” near the end of the introductory text of subsection (d.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “subparagraph (a)(1)(B)” was substituted for “subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a)” in the undesignated paragraph at the end of subsection (d.1).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

35-3-35.1.
Superseded.

Code Commission notes.

The enactment of Code Section

35-3-35.1

by Ga. L. 2005, p. 980, § 1/HB 501, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by the enactment of Code Section

35-3-34.2

by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1196, § 1/SB 6.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

35-3-36.
Duties of state criminal justice agencies as to submission of fingerprints, photographs, and other identifying data to center; responsibility for accuracy.

All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center fingerprints, descriptions, photographs when specifically requested, and other identifying data on persons who have been lawfully arrested or taken into custody in the state for all felonies and for the misdemeanors and violations designated in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 35-3-33 and for persons in the categories enumerated in subparagraphs (a)(1)(B), (a)(1)(C), and (a)(1)(D) of Code Section 35-3-33.

It shall be the duty of all chiefs of police, sheriffs, prosecuting attorneys, courts, judges, clerks of court, community supervision officers, county or Department of Juvenile Justice juvenile probation officers, probation officers and private probation officers serving pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of Title 42, wardens or other persons in charge of penal and correctional institutions in this state, the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to furnish the center with any other data deemed necessary by the center to carry out its responsibilities under this article.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall obtain or cause to be obtained fingerprints in accordance with the fingerprint system of identification established by the director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, full-face and profile photographs if photo equipment is available, and other available identifying data of each person arrested or taken into custody for an offense of a type designated in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-33, of all persons arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice, and of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions; but photographs need not be taken if it is known that photographs of the type listed taken within the previous year are on file. Fingerprints and other identifying data of persons arrested or taken into custody for offenses other than those designated may be taken at the discretion of the law enforcement agency concerned. Any person arrested or taken into custody and subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense through court proceedings shall have any fingerprint record taken in connection therewith returned or deleted, as applicable, if the fingerprint record was taken in error or upon court order, and such dispositions shall be reported to the center.

Fingerprints and other identifying data required to be taken under subsection (c) of this Code section shall be forwarded within 24 hours after taking for filing and classification, but the period of 24 hours may be extended to cover any intervening holiday or weekend. Photographs taken shall be forwarded at the discretion of the agency concerned; but, if not forwarded, the fingerprint record shall be marked “Photo available” and the photographs shall be forwarded subsequently if the center so requests.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrest warrants and related identifying data for all felonies and for the misdemeanors and violations designated in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 35-3-33 immediately upon determination of the fact that the warrant cannot be served for the reasons stated. If any such warrant is subsequently served or withdrawn, the law enforcement agency concerned must immediately notify the center of the service or withdrawal. In addition, the agency concerned must annually, no later than January 31 of each year, and at other times if requested by the center confirm to the center all such arrest warrants of this type which continue to be outstanding.

All persons in charge of state penal and correctional institutions shall obtain fingerprints in accordance with the fingerprint system of identification established by the director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise directed by the center and full-face and profile photographs of all persons received on commitment to these institutions. The prints and photographs so taken shall be forwarded to the center together with any other identifying data requested within ten days after the arrival at the institution of the person committed. At the time of release of any person committed to a correctional institution, the institution shall again obtain fingerprints as provided for in this subsection and forward them to the center within ten days along with any other related information requested by the center. Immediately upon release, the institution shall notify the center of the release of the person.

Criminal justice agencies within this state, all persons in charge of law enforcement agencies, clerks of court, municipal judges when such judges do not have a clerk, magistrates, persons in charge of community supervision, juvenile probation, or Article 6 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 probation offices, and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall transmit to the center the information described in Code Section 35-3-33 within 30 days of the creation or receipt of such information, except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, on the basis of the forms and instructions to be provided by the center. Such forms and instructions shall not be inconsistent with the uniform standards promulgated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (h) of Code Section 15-6-50.3 issued by The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia.

Compliance with the provisions in paragraph (1) of this subsection is mandatory, regardless of whether the center requests the information described in Code Section 35-3-33.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies in this state shall furnish the center with any other identifying data required in accordance with guidelines established by the center. All law enforcement agencies and penal and correctional institutions in this state having criminal identification files shall cooperate in providing to the center copies of identifying data, as required in accordance with center guidelines, in those files as will aid in establishing the nucleus of the state criminal identification file.

All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center, periodically at a time and in such form as prescribed by the center, information regarding only the cases within its jurisdiction and in which it is or has been actively engaged. Such report shall be known as the “uniform crime report” and shall contain crimes reported and otherwise processed during the period preceding the period of report, including the number and nature of offenses committed, the disposition of such offenses, and such other information as the center shall specify, relating to the method, frequency, cause, and prevention of crime. The incident/complaint report forms used by criminal justice agencies shall, when applicable, include the identification of any victim who is a student and the name of the school attended by any such student.

Any governmental agency which is not included within the description of those departments and agencies required to submit the uniform crime report provided for in subsection (i) of this Code section but which desires to submit a report shall be furnished with the proper forms by the center. When a report is received by the center from a governmental agency not required to make a report, the information contained therein shall be included within the periodic compilation provided for in paragraph (9) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-33.

Upon the request of the center, local law enforcement agencies shall periodically provide for audit samples of incident reports for the preceding reporting period so that the center may help ensure agency compliance with national and state uniform crime reporting requirements.

All law enforcement agencies within the state shall report to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, all persons wanted by and all vehicles and identifiable property stolen from their jurisdictions. The report shall be made as soon as practicable after the investigating department or agency either ascertains that a vehicle or identifiable property has been stolen or obtains a warrant for an individual’s arrest or determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the individual has committed the crime. In no event shall this time exceed 12 hours after the investigating department or agency determines that it has grounds to believe that a vehicle or property was stolen or that the wanted person should be arrested.

If at any time after making a report as required by subsection (l) of this Code section it is determined by the reporting department or agency that a person is no longer wanted due to his apprehension or any other factor or when a vehicle or property stolen is recovered, the law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the center of such status. Furthermore, if the agency making the apprehension or recovery is other than the one which made the original wanted or stolen report, then it shall immediately notify the originating agency of the full particulars relating to the apprehension or recovery.

Neither the center nor its employees shall be responsible for the accuracy of information contained in records representing wanted persons, missing persons, and stolen serial numbered property established in computerized files on the Georgia Criminal Justice Information System (CJIS) network or in computerized files maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation National Crime Information Center (NCIC). Criminal justice agencies establishing such records bear all responsibilities for entry, update, and removal as dictated by actions of criminal justice employees and officials.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 6; Ga. L. 1980, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 35; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1022, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1024, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 35; Ga. L. 2003, p. 336, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 3A; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-54/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-6/SB 367; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 35/HB 737; Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 14/SB 441.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, designated the existing provisions of subsection (g) as paragraph (g)(1); in paragraph (g)(1), substituted “Criminal justice agencies within this state, all” for “All” at the beginning, substituted “clerks of court,” for “clerks of court or the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority as applicable,”, added the second sentence; and added paragraph (g)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 3A, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 33-3-36 but actually amended Code Section 35-3-36.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).